Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/de_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1934 Y 1
SFX 1934 s wechsel s
SFX 1885 Y 1
SFX 1885 s werk s
SFX 1176 Y 1
SFX 1176 n ums n
SFX 3331 Y 1
SFX 3331 s xpertin s
SFX 830 Y 1
SFX 830 s teil s
SFX 2874 Y 1
SFX 2874 s transporte s
SFX 4370 Y 1
SFX 4370 s wettbewerb s
SFX 2839 Y 1
SFX 2839 e ist e
SFX 4543 Y 1
SFX 4543 s wettbewerben s
SFX 3785 Y 1
SFX 3785 s technologie s
SFX 3157 Y 1
SFX 3157 e lers e
SFX 1620 Y 1
SFX 1620 s verbandes s
SFX 4824 Y 1
SFX 4824 e haus e
SFX 4081 Y 1
SFX 4081 b ndorten b
SFX 4542 Y 1
SFX 4542 s wettbewerbs s
SFX 2234 Y 1
SFX 2234 t ums t
SFX 2231 Y 1
SFX 2231 s wege s
SFX 3675 Y 1
SFX 3675 s unternehmen s
SFX 4067 Y 1
SFX 4067 f rst f
SFX 2605 Y 1
SFX 2605 s turm s
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 a on a
SFX 3452 Y 1
SFX 3452 b tion b
SFX 2140 Y 1
SFX 2140 s werks s
SFX 4472 Y 1
SFX 4472 e lerin e
SFX 4910 Y 1
SFX 4910 m tschritte m
SFX 4794 Y 1
SFX 4794 e on e
SFX 773 Y 1
SFX 773 a ons a
SFX 2801 Y 1
SFX 2801 s zug s
SFX 1866 Y 1
SFX 1866 e ion e
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 e iten e
SFX 1777 Y 1
SFX 1777 g stand g
SFX 1132 Y 1
SFX 1132 a um a
SFX 3682 Y 1
SFX 3682 s tätigkeiten s
SFX 3116 Y 1
SFX 3116 b tionen b
SFX 608 Y 1
SFX 608 g rken g
SFX 4296 Y 1
SFX 4296 e ologie e
SFX 3219 Y 1
SFX 3219 s turmes s
SFX 2626 Y 1
SFX 2626 g rkzeug g
SFX 1584 Y 1
SFX 1584 s verband s
SFX 1114 Y 1
SFX 1114 d um d
SFX 726 Y 1
SFX 726 g rt g
SFX 4295 Y 1
SFX 4295 k on k
SFX 536 Y 1
SFX 536 g rk g
SFX 864 Y 1
SFX 864 g sens g
SFX 311 Y 1
SFX 311 m schung m
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 g rten g

REP 28
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP ß ss
REP ss ß
REP s ss
REP ss s
REP i ie
REP ie i
REP ee e
REP o oh
REP oh o
REP a ah
REP ah a
REP e eh
REP eh e
REP ae ä
REP oe ö
REP ue ü
REP Ae Ä
REP Oe Ö
REP Ue Ü
REP d t
REP t d
REP th t
REP t th
REP r rh
REP ch k
REP k ch

LANG de_DE
